Arkansas, session 2025, SB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-17-414(g)(5), concerning a waiver of the
required background check for a nonlicensed staff position granted by the
adoption of a resolution by the board of trustees of an educational entity,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(D) A waiver granted by a board of directors of an
educational entity under this subdivision (g)(5) shall be valid for the
duration of the applicant's employment with the educational entity only if
the applicant does not experience:
(i) A break in employment with the educational
entity after receiving the waiver; and
(ii) An additional disqualifying conviction under
this section after receiving the waiver.

*TNL044*
02/13/2025 11:37:02 AM TNL044